Idaho, session 2026, H0768.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-5210, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5210. APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION. (1) An applicant for registra-
tion as a contractor shall submit an application under oath upon on a form to
be prescribed by the board and which that shall include the following infor-
mation pertaining to the applicant:
(a) Social security number for natural persons or employer tax identi-
fication number for other persons;
(b) The name and physical address under which the applicant conducts
business. Any business doing business under an assumed name shall
provide satisfactory proof of having legally filed a certificate of
assumed name with the Idaho secretary of state;
(c) The name and physical address of each principal, member, partner,
shareholder, or any other person claiming an ownership interest in the
business entity for which registration is being applied for that is ap-
plying for registration;
(d) A certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do busi-
ness in the state of Idaho or other satisfactory proof that the appli-
cant has procured and has in effect worker's compensation insurance or
a statement by the contractor as to why such certificate or coverage is
not required for the applicant;
(e) A certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do busi-
ness in the state of Idaho that the applicant has procured and has in ef-
fect a general liability policy, including products and completed op-
erations insurance covering the applicant's construction operations in
the sum of not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) sin-
gle limit. The name of the insurance company, the insured and policy
number shall be made available only to persons or their insurers stating
that they possess a claim against the contractor;
(f) A statement of the type of construction to be undertaken by the ap-
plicant, or such other information as may be required by the board pur-
suant to administrative rules adopted by the board; and


(g) A designated natural person to act as the individual responsible
for compliance with the law and rules applicable to the registration;
(h) A properly executed irrevocable consent to service of process, ap-
plicable only to matters involving the registration, in the manner and
form prescribed by the board; and
(g) (i) A statement that the applicant and each principal, member,
partner, shareholder or any other person claiming an ownership inter-
est in the business entity for which registration is being applied for
herein applying for registration pursuant to this section has never
been denied, surrendered or had revoked a contractor's license or
registration privilege in this or any other state or, if a license or
registration privilege has been denied, surrendered or revoked in this
or any other state, an explanation of any such denial, surrender or re-
vocation.
(2) Along with such application, the applicant shall submit a registra-
tion fee as may be set by the board to cover its administrative and enforce-
ment costs, not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per year.
(3) An application for registration that has been denied by the board
shall be considered a contested case as provided for in chapter 52, title 67,
Idaho Code, and shall be subject to the provisions of that chapter as well as
the administrative rules adopted by the board governing contested cases.
(4) An applicant or registrant shall provide the certificates of insur-
ance required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the board upon
request.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-5215, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5215. AUTHORITY TO INVESTIGATE AND DISCIPLINE -- SUSPENSION OR
REVOCATION OF REGISTRATION. (1) The board may investigate any person engaged
in contracting within the state of Idaho or any person believed to have acted
as a contractor without being duly registered as required by this chapter.
Upon receipt of a written complaint from a person who claims to have been in-
jured or defrauded by such person, or upon information received by the board,
the board shall perform an investigation of the facts alleged against such
person. A contractor shall provide necessary documents and shall promptly
answer all reasonable investigative questions asked by the board. Upon
request, a contractor shall promptly make available to the board all of the
documents that a contractor is required to disclose to owners and purchasers
of residential real property pursuant to section 45-525, Idaho Code. Such
documents shall be made available at the contractor's cost and at the loca-
tion and in the manner requested by the board; provided, however, that the
board may not request any trade secrets as defined in section 74-107(1),
Idaho Code, or more than the minimum necessary amount of information needed
to complete its investigation. If the board investigation reveals that the
facts alleged or received are sufficient to proceed with a formal action, the
board may authorize the filing of an administrative complaint against such
person and may seek injunctive relief prohibiting such person from engaging
in construction.
(2) The board shall have the authority to issue informal letters of rep-
rimand, suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke a registration, impose a civil


penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or per vi-
olation, provided that no such penalty shall be issued for a violation of
paragraph (e), (h), or (i) of this subsection. The board shall also have the
authority to issue a formal reprimand against any registered contractor if,
after an opportunity for a hearing, the board determines that:
(a) A contractor has violated any of the provisions of this chapter in-
cluding, but not limited to, failure to keep current or provide insur-
ance coverage as required by this chapter;
(b) A contractor has violated any of the provisions of chapter 6, title
48, Idaho Code, relating to consumer protection including, but not lim-
ited to, making fraudulent misrepresentations to consumers;
(c) A contractor employed fraud or deception, made a misrepresentation
or misstatement, or employed any unlawful means in applying for or se-
curing registration as a contractor;
(d) A contractor employed fraud or deception, made a misrepresentation
or misstatement, or employed any unlawful means in applying for or se-
curing a building permit or other permits for construction of any type;
(e) A contractor failed to pay the required fee for registration as pro-
vided in this chapter;
(f) A contractor has been convicted of or has engaged in conduct consti-
tuting a violation of public laws, ordinances or rules of this state,
or any subdivision thereof, relevant to contracting, reflecting on
the registered contractor's ability or qualifications to continue
contracting for other persons, and making the registered contractor a
threat to the public safety, health or well-being;
(g) A contractor has engaged in any other conduct whether of the same
or a different character than hereinabove specified which specified
pursuant to this subsection that constitutes dishonest or dishonorable
dealings;
(h) A contractor had a license, registration or certification revoked,
suspended or refused by this or another state, territory, incorporated
municipality, county, alternative form of local government, or other
municipal or political corporation or subdivision of this or another
state, or omitted such information from any application to the board, or
failed to divulge such information when requested by the board;
(i) A contractor has been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of
competent jurisdiction; or
(j) A contractor interfered with an investigation or disciplinary pro-
ceeding by a willful misrepresentation of facts or by the use of threats
or harassment against any person to prevent such person from providing
evidence in a disciplinary proceeding, investigation or other legal ac-
tion instituted in accordance with this chapter.
(3) By order, the board may prohibit any individual associated with a
registration from registering as a contractor under a different name after
the registered individual has had:
(a) Registration revoked; or
(b) Three (3) or more formal discipline actions within five (5) years
for one (1) or more violations of paragraph (b), (c), (d), (f), (g), or
(j) of subsection (2) of this section.


(3) (4) A contractor whose registration has been revoked or suspended
shall be required to return his certificate of registration within the time
determined by the board or, upon a failure to do so, shall be liable for civil
penalties as set by the board but not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per
day for each day the certificate is not returned after the expiration of the
period allowed.
(4) (5) The suspension or revocation of a registration shall be consid-
ered a contested case as provided for in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and
shall be subject to the provisions of that chapter as well as the administra-
tive rules adopted by the board governing contested cases.
(5) (6) The assessment of attorney's fees and costs incurred in the in-
vestigation and prosecution or defense of a person under this section shall
be governed by the provisions of section 12-117(5), Idaho Code.
(7) For a violation of this section, the board may require successful
completion of a training course adopted by the board in lieu of formal disci-
pline.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-5216, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5216. REINSTATEMENT OF REGISTRATION AFTER DISCIPLINE. (1) The
board may reinstate a suspended or revoked registration upon a showing that:
(1) (a) The grounds for such suspension or revocation have been elimi-
nated;
(2) (b) Such a violation is not likely to reoccur in the future; and
(3) (c) The public interest is not jeopardized by reinstating the reg-
istration.
(2) An individual who is prohibited from registration pursuant to the
provisions of section 54-5215(3), Idaho Code, shall be entitled to submit
an application for new registration pursuant to the provisions of section
67-2614(10), Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.